Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.464

Financial education public-private partnership—Contents of report.

The annual report from the financial education public-private partnership, provided funds are available, shall include:

(1) Results from the jumpstart survey of personal financial literacy;

(2) Progress toward statewide adoption of financial education standards by school districts;

(3) Professional development activities related to equipping teachers with the knowledge and skills to teach financial education;

(4) Activities related to financial education curriculum development; and

(5) Any recommendations for policies or other activities to support financial education instruction in public schools.

[ 2009 c 443 s 4.]